California, session 20252026, AB2032.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Invasive golden mussels are a serious threat to water infrastructure, water systems, water bodies, and ecosystem health.(2) Golden mussels have been detected throughout the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta and in the southern portion of the State Water Project, creating an emerging crisis that necessitates an emergency response.(3) Golden mussels tolerate a wider range of environmental conditions than other invasive mussel species previously encountered in the state, and have been able to establish robust populations throughout the Delta.(4) Several mollusk treatment methodologies, including filters, ultraviolet light, chemicals, and coatings, are available and may be effective to control the spread and settlement of golden mussels. These methodologies are being tested and refined for use specifically against golden mussels under various conditions across the state.(5) In order to maintain the function of water supply systems and facilities, golden mussels must be removed from pipes, screens, filters, and other infrastructure. Water agencies are experiencing a significant increase in these maintenance activities.(6) To promote efficiency, permitting efforts to control and mitigate the effects of golden mussels in the state must strategically align existing processes to reduce the amount of time necessary to prepare, submit, process, and approve subsequent permits.(7) To combat the spread of golden mussels, it is necessary to engage in scientific research efforts to obtain information on golden mussel biology and ecology and feasibility studies for prevention, mitigation, control, and eradication methods.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to do both of the following:(1) Support public and private agencies that operate water supply systems in the prevention, mitigation, control, and eradication of golden mussels.(2) Align permitting processes to better support the necessary rapid response to prevent serious impacts of golden mussels on water infrastructure, water supply systems, and water bodies.SEC. 2. Section 2150.6 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:2150.6. (a) A public or private agency that operates a water supply system and has submitted a control plan to the department, prepared pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2301, shall be exempt from any permit requirement for golden mussels pursuant to this chapter for maintenance and operational activities to control the spread of golden mussels in the water supply system, including removing golden mussels from pipes, screens, filters, and other infrastructure in accordance with the submitted control plan.(b) An exemption under subdivision (a) shall remain in effect for a particular public or private agency until the department determines the agency’s control plan does not meet the statutory requirements for control plans or approves the control plan.SEC. 3. Section 2301.5 is added to the Fish and Game Code, to read:2301.5. (a) The department’s Invasive Species Program shall develop, by April 1, 2027, guidance for public and private agencies that operate water supply systems to develop effective control plans pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2301. The guidance shall include relevant protocols, example standards, and statutory requirements of a control plan. Other than the statutory requirements of a control plan contained in the guidance, the guidance is voluntary for a public or private agency that operates a water supply system to comply with.(b) (1) The department’s Invasive Species Program shall develop and publish on the department’s internet website, by April 1, 2027, guidance for scientific research conducted by or for public and private agencies that operate water supply systems to control the spread of golden mussels, including biology, ecology, and feasibility studies for golden mussel prevention, mitigation, control, and eradication methods. The guidance shall also include mussel handling standards for mussel handling to minimize any potential negative impacts of the possession and transportation of golden mussels.(2) A public or private agency that operates a water supply system and does not have an approved control plan pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2301 may submit to the department a streamlined project proposal for scientific research that investigates the biology, ecology, and feasibility of golden mussel prevention, mitigation, control, and eradication methods. The project proposal shall comply with the guidance published pursuant to paragraph (1). For a public or private agency not submitting a project proposal, the guidance is voluntary to comply with.(3) Scientific research described in a project proposal submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) is exempt from scientific collecting permits for golden mussels under Section 1002 and restricted species permits for golden mussels under Section 2150.(4) An exemption under paragraph (3) shall terminate for a particular public or private agency upon the agency’s submission of a control plan to the department pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2301.(c) The department shall update the spatial distribution maps of golden mussel-infested water bodies posted on its internet website no less than quarterly based on monitoring and reported detections. The maps shall distinguish between reported and confirmed detections of golden mussels and include the date of the most recent map update to provide the most accurate and up-to-date information.SEC. 4. Section 12824.1 is added to the Food and Agricultural Code, to read:12824.1. (a) In response to an invasive species threat, including, but not limited to, the threat of golden mussels, the department shall work with state and local agencies in order to quickly and efficiently respond to the threat. The department shall identify any tools available to assist a state or local agency in rapidly responding to the invasive species threat. This may include, but is not limited to, identifying any strategy, including an integrated pest management strategy, or a registered pesticide that would be a valuable tool to address the threat.(b) The department shall help identify any existing processes that allow for the rapid use of any tool that could be used to address the invasive species threat and enables a streamlined or faster administrative or procedural process.SEC. 5. Section 13371 is added to the Water Code, to read:13371. (a) In response to an invasive species threat, including, but not limited to, the threat of golden mussels, the state and regional boards shall work with state and local agencies in order to quickly and efficiently respond to the threat. The state board shall identify any tools available to assist a state or local agency in rapidly responding to the invasive species threat.(b) The state board shall help identify any existing processes that allow for the rapid use of any tool that could be used to address the invasive species threat and enables a streamlined or faster administrative or procedural process. (c) The state board, shall, if necessary, help coordinate efforts between the regional boards in response to a threat of an invasive species.SEC. 6. This act is an urgency statute necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety within the meaning of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall go into immediate effect. The facts constituting the necessity are:In order to respond to the serious threat golden mussels pose to water infrastructure, water systems, water bodies, and ecosystem health, which has created an emerging crisis that necessitates an emergency response, it is necessary that this act take immediate effect.